Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
CHAPTER 232 Nudist Societies

232.010.
Nudist defined.

As used in this chapter, “nudist” means any person who displays any part of his private person naked before persons of the opposite sex, not his husband or wife, at their solicitation or with their consent, for religious or health purposes, excepting for purposes of examination and treatment by physicians.

History.

3727b-1: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 203, § 1.

232.020.
License required; tax. [Repealed.]

232.021.
License required for operation of society — Application — Fee — Expiration — Renewal.

No person shall own or operate a nudist society unless he first secures a license from the county judge/executive in the county in which the nudist society will be located. Any person who desires a license shall file an application with the county clerk setting forth the name and address of the owner of the premises upon which the nudist society will be located and the name of the operator, the occupation of the owner or operator, the reason for forming the society and its purpose, the location of the area of the proposed nudist society, and a description of the physical facilities and precautions to be taken which will assure privacy of members and concealment and reasonable isolation of the nudists from the public. If the county judge/executive finds that the character of the applicant is good, the nudist society is proposed to be conducted for religious or health purposes, the facilities appear adequate and the nudist society will be so located or screened or housed, and so operated, as to give reasonable assurance that its activities will be effectively concealed and its members reasonably isolated from the ordinary view and presence of the general public, the county judge/executive shall issue the license upon payment of a fee of one hundred dollars ($100). Each license to operate a nudist society shall expire one (1) year from issuance but may be renewed annually upon payment of a renewal fee of fifty dollars ($50).

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 203, § 2; 1978, ch. 384, § 371, effective June 17, 1978.

232.030.
Nudist society premises to be surrounded by wall. [Repealed.]

232.031.
Revocation of license — Grounds.

A license to operate a nudist society may be revoked by order of the county judge/executive at any time, following a hearing upon reasonable notice to the licensee and a finding by the county judge/executive that:

The activities of the nudist society are not being effectively concealed from the ordinary view of the public, or

The activities of the nudist society are not sufficiently isolated from the public, or sufficient precautions are not being taken to exclude the presence of nonmembers, or

The nudist society is not being operated in accordance with the purpose for which it was licensed, or

The owner or operator has been convicted of a felony, or a misdemeanor involving disorder or breach of the peace arising out of the operation of the nudist society.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 203, § 3; 1978, ch. 384, § 372, effective June 17, 1978.

232.040.
Nudist society to be inspected. [Repealed.]

232.041.
Inspection of society — Register of members required.

Each licensed nudist society shall be subject to such reasonable inspection by the sheriff or deputies designated by him as may reasonably be deemed necessary to enforce KRS

232.010

to

232.041

and

232.991

, and acting in a reasonable manner sheriffs or deputy sheriffs shall have the right to go upon the private property and gain access to the buildings or inclosures of licensed nudist societies. The owner, operator, or person in charge of a nudist society shall keep a register of names and addresses of members of the society which shall be made available for inspection by proper authorities upon order of the county judge/executive.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 203, § 4.

232.050.
Persons entering to be registered. [Repealed.]

232.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]

232.991.
Operating society without license, penalty.

Any person who owns or operates a nudist society, whether for religious or health purposes, without a valid license from the county judge/executive shall be fined not less than five hundred ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned in the county jail for not less than ten (10) nor more than thirty (30) days, or both fined and imprisoned.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 203, § 5; 1978, ch. 384, § 373, effective June 17, 1978.